District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.07

Transitional provisions.

Persons holding nontemporary appointments in the District of Columbia government, paid from appropriations made to the Office of the Mayor, may, on January 2, 1979, be reassigned to other offices or agencies of the District government. Persons holding appointments in the District of Columbia government, paid from appropriations made to the Council of the District of Columbia and classified as a GS-10 or less under § 5332 of Title 5 of the United States Code and whose position would not be in the Excepted Service under the provisions of this subchapter on January 1, 1980, shall be appointed to the Career Service created in subchapter VIII of this chapter, if such incumbent is found to possess the minimal qualifications for the position to which he or she is appointed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 907, 25 DCR 5740
This section is referenced in § 1-636.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-610.7.
1973 Ed., § 1-339.7.